Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1002. Penalties.

Upon conviction, any criminal justice agency or official subject to fingerprinting or reporting requirements under this subchapter that knowingly fails to comply with the fingerprinting or reporting requirements is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

A person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor upon conviction if the person knowingly:

Accesses information or obtains information collected and maintained under this subchapter for a purpose not specified by this subchapter; or

Releases or discloses information maintained under this subchapter to another person who lacks authority to receive the information.

A person is guilty of a Class D felony upon conviction if the person violates subsection (a) of this section for the purpose of:

Furthering the commission of a misdemeanor offense or felony offense by the person or another person;

Enhancing or assisting a person's position in a legal proceeding in this state or influencing the outcome of a legal proceeding in this state for the benefit of the person or a member of the person's family;

Causing a pecuniary or professional gain for the person or a member of the person's family; or

Political purposes for the person or a member of the person's family.

A person convicted of violating subsection (c) of this section is subject to an additional fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 1224, § 3, provided:

“The provisions of this act shall not be retroactive.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “Upon conviction” in (a); added the (b)(1) designation; in (b)(1), substituted “Upon conviction, any” for “Every” and inserted “collected and maintained under this subchapter”; added (b)(2); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b)(1); inserted (b)(2) and (c); redesignated former (b)(2) as present (d); and substituted “subsection (c)” for “subdivision (b)(1)” in (d).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 added “knowingly” at the end of the introductory language of (b); substituted “Accesses” for “Knowingly accesses” in (b)(1); and substituted “Releases” for “Knowingly releases” in (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 845 substituted “the fingerprinting or” for “such” following “comply with” in (a); added “knowingly” at the end of the introductory language of (b); in (b)(1), substituted “Accesses” for “Knowingly accesses” and deleted “willfully” preceding “obtains”; and substituted “Releases” for “Knowingly releases” in (b)(2).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal history information on identifiable individuals charged with or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or being found guilty of, criminal offenses under the laws of the State of Arkansas; and

Dissemination of juvenile aftercare and custody information.

Criminal history information collected and maintained by the center is not considered public record information within the intent and meaning of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the (b)(1) designation; rewrote (b)(1); and added (b)(2).

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “and the State Crime Laboratory” in (a); inserted “criminal justice” preceding “officials” in (b); inserted “unlawfully” preceding “purged” in (c); added (d); and made minor stylistic changes in (b) and (c).

Cross References. Release of criminal history information, authorization of, §12-12-1507.

Unrestricted information, records, immunity from civil liability, §12-12-1506.

Fingerprint cards or fingerprint images may be retained by the Identification Bureau, and criminal history information may be retained by the central repository for any criminal offense.

A DNA sample provided under this section shall be delivered to the State Crime Laboratory by a law enforcement officer at the law enforcement agency that took the sample in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory.

A DNA sample taken under this section shall be retained in the State DNA Data Bank established under § 12-12-1106.

A DNA sample provided under this section shall be taken in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory in consultation with the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Department of Health.

Refusal to be fingerprinted or photographed or refusal to provide a DNA sample as required by this subchapter is a Class B misdemeanor.

A person authorized by this section to take a DNA sample is not criminally liable for taking a DNA sample under this subchapter if he or she takes the DNA sample in good faith and uses reasonable force.

A person authorized by this section to take a DNA sample is not civilly liable for taking a DNA sample if the person acted in good faith, in a reasonable manner, using reasonable force, and according to generally accepted medical and other professional practices.

An authorized law enforcement agency or an authorized correctional agency may employ reasonable force if an individual refuses to submit to a taking of a DNA sample authorized under this subchapter.

An employee of an authorized law enforcement agency or an authorized correctional agency is not criminally or civilly liable for the use of reasonable force described in subdivision (k)(1) of this section.

A person less than eighteen (18) years of age is exempt from all provisions of this section regarding the collection of a DNA sample unless that person is charged by the prosecuting attorney as an adult in circuit court or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of a felony offense in circuit court.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment inserted (a)(2)(D) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2015 amendment by No. 543 added “any felony offense” at the end of (a)(2); and deleted (a)(2)(A) through (F).

The 2015amendment by No. 954 redesignated former (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A); and added (a)(1)(B).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Fingerprinting and photographing, §9-27-320.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

An arrest;

The release of a person after arrest without the filing of a charge;

A decision by a prosecutor not to commence criminal proceedings or to defer or indefinitely postpone prosecution;

An indictment or criminal information or other statement of charges;

The dismissal of an indictment or criminal information, or of any of the charges set out in such indictment or criminal information;

An acquittal, finding of guilt, or other court disposition at or following trial, including dispositions of probationary status;

The terms and conditions of a sentence;

A commitment to a state or local correctional facility;

A commitment to a hospital or other facility as not being criminally responsible or as incompetent to stand trial;

The entry of an appeal to an appellate court;

The judgment of an appellate court;

A pardon, reprieve, commutation, or other change in sentence; and

Other events occurring during the course of the criminal proceedings determined to be reportable.

In cases in which the defendant has not been arrested at the time of an indictment, information, or charge, the arrest tracking number shall be filed with the court clerk immediately after there is an arrest.

The arrest tracking number shall be in the court's case file before a trial commences or a judgment is entered.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (e)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “in which” for “where” in present (e)(2)(B).

Cross References. Disposition of criminal data to the central repository, §12-12-1505.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (e).

The 2013 amendment substituted “A sealed record” for “Expunged records” in (d).

Physical destruction of records is not contemplated by Arkansas law; therefore, summary judgment was properly granted to the Arkansas Crime Information Center (ACIC) and other parties in an action alleging a violation of an arrestee's civil rights because there was no requirement that the ACIC physically destroy expunged records under former §16-90-901(a)(2), and dissemination of the expunged records was allowed to criminal justice agencies for criminal justice purposes under this section.Jones v. Huckabee, 369 Ark. 42, 250 S.W.3d 241 (2007).

Constable's suit against Arkansas Crime Information Center (ACIC) was barred under doctrine of sovereign immunity because §12-12-201 et seq. did not require a law enforcement officer to be provided with a specific type of access to information, such as via radio transmission; the constable had no clear and legal right to transmit information to, and receive information from, the ACIC system in the most rapid manner available. Clowers v. Lassiter, 363 Ark. 241, 213 S.W.3d 6 (2005).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “nongovernmental” preceding “agency” in (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment by No. 168 added (f).

The 2009 amendment by No. 974 added (g).

Constable's suit against Arkansas Crime Information Center (ACIC) was barred under doctrine of sovereign immunity because §12-12-201 et seq. did not require a law enforcement officer to be provided with a specific type of access to information, such as via radio transmission; the constable had no clear and legal right to transmit information to, and receive information from, the ACIC system in the most rapid manner available. Clowers v. Lassiter, 363 Ark. 241, 213 S.W.3d 6 (2005).

Pending information, conviction information, and nonconviction information available through the Arkansas Crime Information Center, plus information obtained through the Interstate Identification Index or from another state's record system and juvenile aftercare and custody information, shall be disseminated to criminal justice agencies and officials for the administration of criminal justice.

A criminal justice agency shall query the center to obtain the latest updated information prior to disseminating criminal history information, unless the criminal justice agency knows that the center does not maintain the criminal history information or is incapable of responding within the necessary time period.

If a criminal justice agency disseminates criminal history information received from the center to another criminal justice agency, the disseminating criminal justice agency shall maintain for at least one (1) year a dissemination log recording the identity of the record subject, the agencies or persons to whom the criminal history information was disseminated, and the date it was provided.

A sealed record shall be made available to criminal justice agencies for criminal justice purposes as other laws permit.

A DNA sample or DNA record obtained under this subchapter shall be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies and criminal justice officials for the administration of criminal justice.

Conviction information shall be made available for the following noncriminal justice purposes:

Conviction information disseminated for noncriminal justice purposes under this subchapter shall be used only for the purposes for which it was made available and may not be redisseminated.

Nonconviction information shall not be available under the provisions of this subchapter for noncriminal justice purposes.

No agency or individual shall confirm the existence or nonexistence of criminal history information to any person or organization that would not be eligible to receive the criminal history information pursuant to this subchapter.

A local agency may release its own agency records according to its own policy.

The Department of Arkansas State Police Automated Fingerprint Identification System may access and use the National Fingerprint File and Interstate Identification Index as provided by the Federal Bureau of Investigation when the Arkansas Code authorizes a fingerprint-based Federal Bureau of Investigation check for a noncriminal justice purpose and a positive identification based on fingerprints is made.

A DNA sample or DNA record obtained under this subchapter is not available under this subchapter for noncriminal justice purposes.

(1)Criminal history information shall be made available to the Governor for purposes of carrying out the Governor's constitutional authority involving pardons, executive clemencies, extraditions, or other duties specifically authorized by law.

Persons performing research related to the administration of criminal justice, subject to conditions approved by the central repository or the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police to assure the security of the information and the privacy of individuals to whom the criminal history information relates; and

Private contractors housing state inmates for a governmental criminal justice agency under a specific agreement approved by the Arkansas Crime Information Center that limits the use of the criminal history information to the purposes for which given to ensure the security and confidentiality of the criminal history information.

(1)Criminal history information shall be made available according to the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 42 U.S.C. § 14616, as it existed on January 1, 2001.

The Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall execute, administer, and implement the compact on behalf of the state and may adopt necessary rules and procedures for the national exchange of criminal history information for noncriminal justice purposes.

Ratification of the compact does not affect the obligations and responsibilities of the center regarding the dissemination of criminal history information within Arkansas.

(1)Criminal history information may be requested by a noncriminal justice agency and shall be made available after a review and express approval of dissemination by the director.

The specific criminal history information being requested;

A list of all persons who will have access to the criminal history information;

A detailed description of how the criminal history information will be used and protected; and

A named temporary custodian of the criminal history information received.

Criminal history information that is requested under this subsection is limited to criminal history information pertaining to criminal offenses that occurred in Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 519 inserted “of criminal history information” in the section heading; substituted “Private contractors housing state inmates for a governmental criminal justice agency under a specific agreement” for “Private contractors providing penitentiary services to a governmental criminal justice agency pursuant to a specific agreement” in (a)(2)(B); deleted “the provisions of” following “according to” in (b)(1); deleted “and the compact shall remain in effect until legislation is enacted renouncing the compact” following “2001” in (b)(2)(A); deleted “the repository of criminal history records” following “Center” in (b)(2)(B); substituted “information” for “records” in (b)(2)(B) and (b)(2)(C); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(2)(A).

U.S. Code. The National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 42 U.S.C. § 14616, referred to in this section, is currently codified at 34 U.S.C. § 40316.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Release of criminal history information for noncriminal justice purposes shall be made only by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police or the central repository, under the limitations contained in § 12-12-1009, and such compiled records will not be released or disclosed for noncriminal justice purposes by other agencies in the state.

Intelligence and investigative files maintained by law enforcement agencies shall be kept separated from criminal history information and shall not be subject to dissemination under the provisions of this subchapter.

(1)(A)A fee may be charged for providing criminal history information for noncriminal justice purposes.

However, the fee for providing criminal history information may be waived at the request of a:

Local school district, for providing criminal history information concerning a volunteer in a public school program; or

(a)Nonprofit organization whose purpose is to serve juveniles, for providing criminal history information concerning volunteers to the nonprofit organization.

This exemption shall not be applicable to a child care facility whose owner, operator, or employees are required under § 20-78-606 to apply to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police for a criminal records check.

The amount of the fee for electronic Internet submission will be determined jointly by the bureau and the central repository and shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), exclusive of any third-party electronic processing fee charges.

Effective July 1, 2005, the amount of the fee for providing information by means other than the Internet shall be determined jointly by the bureau and the central repository and shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30.00).

(1)There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the State Police Equipment Fund.

Fifty percent (50%) to the Crime Information System Fund, there to be used for the continued operation and expansion of the automated criminal history system; and

Fifty percent (50%) to the State Police Equipment Fund, there to be used for the continued operation and expansion of the automated fingerprint identification system.

Fees collected under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenue as follows:

Ten dollars ($10.00) of each fee collected shall be credited to the Crime Information System Fund; and

The portion of a collected fee that exceeds ten dollars ($10.00) shall be credited to the State Police Equipment Fund.

(A)Special revenues deposited into the Crime Information System Fund and the State Police Equipment Fund may be used for personal services and operating expenses as provided by law and for conducting criminal background checks for noncriminal justice purposes.

The special revenues unused at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 1573 redesignated former (a)(2) and (b)(2) as present (a)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(A); in (a)(2)(A), substituted “the fee for electronic Internet submission” for “such fee” and added “exclusive of any third-party electronic processing fee charges”; added (a)(2)(B) and (b)(2)(B); inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section” in (b)(1); and, in (b)(2)(A), substituted “Fees collected under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall” for “Effective July 1, 1997, such fees collected shall then” and “identification” for “indentification.”

The 2005 amendment by No. 1962, in (b)(1), deleted “All fees shall be deposited immediately in the State Treasury as special revenue to the credit of the State Police Equipment fund” from the beginning and substituted “a State Police Equipment Fund” for “there to be used for the acquisition of an automated fingerprint identification system”; rewrote (b)(2); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§20-78-606” for “§20-78-601 et seq.” in (b).

Cross References. State Police Equipment Fund, §19-6-474.

(1)A person, upon positive verification of his or her identity, may review criminal history information pertaining to the person compiled and maintained by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police or the central repository and may challenge the completeness or accuracy of the criminal history information.

A copy of criminal history information maintained in the Arkansas Crime Information Center on the person may be made available to the person or the person's attorney or other designee authorized in writing by the person.

A request for a copy of any criminal history information maintained in the National Crime Information Center shall be addressed to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

If the person, after appropriate review, believes that the criminal history information is incorrect or incomplete in any way, he or she may request an examination and correction of the criminal history information by the agency responsible for the criminal history information.

(1)If it is determined as a result of the challenge that the criminal history information is inaccurate, incomplete, or improperly maintained, the criminal history information shall be appropriately corrected.

(1)(A)Criminal history information that was recorded before August 13, 1993, is subject to the right of review and challenge in accordance with this section.

However, the duty of an agency in searching for criminal history information under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section is to make a reasonable search for criminal history information.

An agency does not have a duty under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section to provide access to that segment of criminal history information that cannot be located after a reasonable search.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “person” for “subject” and “criminal history information” for “record” and variants throughout; rewrote (d)(1)(B); and made minor stylistic changes.

Cross References. Right of review and challenge, §12-12-1509.

The right of a person to review his or her criminal history information shall not be used by a prospective employer or another person as a means to circumvent procedures or fees for accessing records for noncriminal justice purposes.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be authorized to develop standards and implement procedures that will, to the maximum extent feasible, ensure the security and confidentiality of criminal history records.

The center shall be authorized to inspect the criminal history records maintained by criminal justice agencies, to evaluate security procedures, and to issue reports on compliance with security standards.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall be authorized to develop standards and implement a program of audits of all criminal justice agencies that establish, maintain, report, or disseminate criminal history records, to ensure compliance with all provisions of this subchapter.

Audit procedures pertaining to the courts shall be coordinated and implemented through the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 15; 2009, No. 974, § 3; 2011, No. 1224, § 2; 2017, No. 250, § 5; 2017, No. 845, § 4.

12-12-1003. Scope.

This subchapter governs the:

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the Arkansas Crime Information Center may issue rules and implement this subchapter.

The State Crime Laboratory may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter relating to the collection, maintenance, dissemination, removal, or destruction of DNA samples or DNA records.

The reporting requirements of this subchapter apply to prosecuting attorneys, judges, and law enforcement, court, probation, correction, and parole officials within the limits defined in §§12-12-1006 and12-12-1007.

This subchapter does not apply to records of traffic offenses, including misdemeanor offenses of driving while intoxicated, maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 2; 2001, No. 1048, § 2; 2009, No. 974, § 4.

12-12-1004. Completeness and accuracy.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center and the State Crime Laboratory shall implement procedures that will, to the maximum extent feasible, ensure the completeness and accuracy of all criminal history information in this state.

All criminal justice agencies and criminal justice officials shall maintain complete and accurate records, as may be appropriate to their area of operation, and shall report information from the records as required in §§12-12-1006 and12-12-1007.

The center shall maintain all information reported under this subchapter in a complete and permanent manner to ensure that records are not altered, unlawfully purged, or otherwise lost.

The State Crime Laboratory shall maintain all DNA samples or DNA records obtained under this subchapter in a complete and permanent manner to ensure that DNA samples or DNA records are not altered, unlawfully purged, or lost.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 3; 2009, No. 974, § 5.

12-12-1005. Identification Bureau.

The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall collect and maintain fingerprint identification records required to be reported by this subchapter.

The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall provide arrest and identification information for inclusion in the computerized criminal history file, as specified by the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

(1)Arkansas shall be a single-source state for the submission of fingerprint cards or fingerprint images to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

All fingerprint cards or fingerprint images, under the provisions of this subchapter, shall be submitted by Arkansas law enforcement agencies to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 4; 1997, No. 826, § 4.

12-12-1006. Fingerprinting, DNA sample collection, and photographing.

(1)(A) Immediately following an arrest for an offense, a law enforcement official at the receiving criminal detention facility shall take, or cause to be taken, the fingerprints and a photograph of the arrested person if the offense is a felony or a Class A misdemeanor.

A law enforcement official at the receiving criminal detention facility shall not take fingerprints of the arrested person if:

The arrest was for a probation violation; and

The arrested person's fingerprints are already possessed by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a law enforcement official at the receiving criminal detention facility shall take, or cause to be taken, a DNA sample of a person arrested for any felony offense.

(1)When the first appearance of a defendant in court is caused by a citation or summons for an offense, a law enforcement official at the receiving criminal detention facility shall take, or cause to be taken, the fingerprints and a photograph of the arrested person when the offense is a felony or a Class A misdemeanor.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) of this section, if the first appearance of a defendant in court is caused by a citation or summons for a felony offense enumerated in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court immediately shall order and a law enforcement officer shall take or cause to be taken a DNA sample of the arrested person.

(1)When felony or Class A misdemeanor charges are brought against a person already in the custody of a law enforcement agency or correctional agency and the charges are separate from the charges for which the person was previously arrested or confined, the law enforcement agency or the correctional agency shall again take the fingerprints and photograph of the person in connection with the new charges.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section, when a felony charge enumerated in subdivision (a)(2) of this section is brought against a person already in the custody of a law enforcement agency or a correctional agency and the felony charge is separate from the charge or charges for which the person was previously arrested or confined, the law enforcement agency or the correctional agency shall take or cause to be taken a DNA sample of the person in connection with the new felony charge unless the law enforcement agency or the correctional agency can verify that the person's DNA record is stored in the State DNA Data Base or CODIS.

(1)When a defendant pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of any felony or Class A misdemeanor charge, the court shall order that the defendant be immediately fingerprinted and photographed by the appropriate law enforcement official.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (d)(1) of this section, if a defendant pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of a felony charge enumerated in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court shall order that the defendant provide a DNA sample to the appropriate law enforcement official unless the appropriate law enforcement official can verify that the defendant's DNA record is stored in the State DNA Data Base or CODIS.

(1)Fingerprints or photographs taken after arrest or court appearance under subsections (a) and (b) of this section or taken from persons already in custody under subsection (c) of this section shall be forwarded to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police within forty-eight (48) hours after the arrest or court appearance.

Fingerprints or photographs taken under subsection (d) of this section shall be forwarded to the Identification Bureau by the fingerprinting official within five (5) working days after the plea or finding of guilt.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 5; 1997, No. 826, § 5; 1997, No. 1231, § 1; 2001, No. 177, § 2; 2001, No. 1712, § 2; 2009, No. 974, § 6; 2011, No. 699, § 1; 2015, No. 543, § 1; 2015, No. 954, § 1.

12-12-1007. Reporting requirements.

Certain events occurring during the course of a criminal prosecution must be reported for inclusion in a criminal history record. The following events shall be reportable events:

A reportable event specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be reported by those criminal justice officials or agencies directly responsible for the reportable action, event, or decision.

The form and content of reported information and the method of reporting shall be specified by the Arkansas Crime Information Center and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Criminal justice agencies shall report criminal history information, whether directly or indirectly, manually or by means of an automated system in accordance with the following provisions:

Information pertaining to the release of a person arrested without the filing of charges as required in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, or to a decision by the prosecutor not to commence criminal proceedings or to defer or postpone prosecution indefinitely as required by subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall be reported within five (5) working days; and

Information pertaining to any other reportable events specified in subdivisions (a)(4)-(13) of this section shall be reported at least monthly.

(1)It shall be the duty of law enforcement officials, prosecuting attorneys, court clerks, and judges to report the arrest tracking number of each defendant in accordance with procedures established by the center.

(A)The arrest tracking number shall be filed with the court clerk at the time an indictment, information, or charge is filed.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 6; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 2; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 41.

12-12-1008. Dissemination for criminal justice purposes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 7; 2001, No. 1048, § 3; 2009, No. 974, § 7; 2013, No. 1460, § 4.

12-12-1009. Dissemination of conviction information for noncriminal justice purposes.

To any local, state, or federal governmental agency that requests the conviction information for the enforcement of a local, state, or federal law;

To any entity authorized either by the subject of the record in writing or by state or federal law to receive the conviction information; and

To any federal agency or central repository in another state requesting the conviction information for a purpose authorized by law.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 8; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 3; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 3; 2005, No. 2213, § 1; 2009, No. 168, § 1; 2009, No. 974, § 8.

12-12-1010. Dissemination of criminal history information for other purposes.

Criminal history information may be made available to:

(A)The General Assembly approves and ratifies the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 42 U.S.C. § 14616, as it existed on January 1, 2001.

Requests for criminal history information by a noncriminal justice agency shall be made to the director and shall include:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 9; 1999, No. 1330, § 1; 2001, No. 329, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §
867; 2019, No. 519, § 1;
2019, No. 910, § 5857.

12-12-1011. Dissemination limited.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 10.

12-12-1012. Fees for noncriminal justice record searches.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3) of this section, all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenue and credited:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 11; 1995, No. 847, § 1; 1997, No. 447, § 1; 1997, No. 1102, § 3; 2005, No. 1573, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 42; 2009, No. 762, § 1.

12-12-1013. Right of review and challenge.

(A)The criminal history information may be reviewed only by the person or the person's attorney or other designee authorized in writing by the subject.

Immediately after correction under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the agency responsible for the criminal history information shall notify every agency or person known to have received the criminal history information within the previous one-year period and provide the agency or person with corrected criminal history information.

A person whose criminal history information has been corrected may ascertain the names of those agencies or individuals known to have received the previously incorrect criminal history information.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 12; 1997, No. 826, § 6; 2009, No. 974, § 9.

12-12-1014. Security of criminal history information.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 13.

12-12-1015. Audit of criminal history records.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 14.

12-12-1016. Powers and duties of State Crime Laboratory.

In addition to any other power or duty conferred by this subchapter, the State Crime Laboratory shall expand the:

State DNA Data Base established under § 12-12-1105 to store and maintain DNA records generated under this subchapter; and

State DNA Data Bank established under § 12-12-1106 to retain DNA samples provided under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 974, § 10.

12-12-1017. Procedures for conduct, disposition, and use of DNA analysis.

The State Crime Laboratory shall promulgate rules governing the procedures to be used in the submission, identification, analysis, storage, and disposition of DNA samples and typing results of DNA samples submitted under this subchapter.

The procedures described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall include quality assurance guidelines to ensure that DNA identification records meet standards for laboratories that submit DNA records to the State DNA Data Base.

The typing results of DNA samples shall be securely stored in the State DNA Data Base, and records of testing shall be retained on file with the State Crime Laboratory.

Except as provided in § 12-12-1018, the tests to be performed on each DNA sample shall be used only for law enforcement identification purposes, including the identification of missing persons, and to assist in the recovery or identification of human remains from disasters.

The results of the DNA analysis conducted under this subchapter from a person adjudicated delinquent may be used for any law enforcement agency identification purpose, including adult prosecution.

The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based on a State DNA Data Base match or State DNA Data Base information is not invalidated if the DNA sample was obtained or placed in the State DNA Data Base by mistake.

The State Crime Laboratory may contract with a third party for purposes of carrying out any function of this subchapter.

Any third party contracting to carry out a function of this subchapter is subject to any restriction and requirement of this subchapter that apply to the State Crime Laboratory as well as any additional restriction imposed by the State Crime Laboratory.

Make information available from the State DNA Data Base as provided in this section.

An acquittal;

A dismissal;

A nolle prosequi;

A successful completion of a preprosecution diversion program or a conditional discharge;

A conviction of a Class B misdemeanor or Class C misdemeanor; or

A reversal of the conviction that led to the inclusion of the DNA record and DNA sample; or

Has not resulted in a charge within one (1) year of the date of the arrest.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the State Crime Laboratory shall remove and destroy a person's DNA record and DNA sample by purging the DNA record and other identifiable information from the State DNA Data Base and the DNA sample stored in the State DNA Data Bank when the person provides the State Crime Laboratory with:

A certified copy of:

An order of acquittal;

An order of dismissal;

An order nolle prosequi;

Documentation reflecting a successful completion of a preprosecution diversion program or a conditional discharge;

A judgment of conviction of a Class B misdemeanor or Class C misdemeanor; or

A court order that reverses the conviction that led to the inclusion of the DNA record and DNA sample; or

A court order stating that a charge arising out of the person's arrest has not been filed within one (1) year of the date of the arrest.

The State Crime Laboratory shall not remove or destroy a person's DNA record or DNA sample under subsection (b) of this section if the person had a prior felony or Class A misdemeanor conviction or a pending charge for which collection of a DNA sample is authorized under Arkansas law.

When the State Crime Laboratory removes and destroys a person's DNA record and DNA sample under subsection (b) of this section, the State Crime Laboratory shall request that the person's DNA record be purged from the National DNA Index System.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added present (a)(1)(F); added present (b)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and added present (b)(3)(A)(vi).

Publisher's Notes. Former subchapter 11, concerning a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) database, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 737, § 23. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-12-1101. Acts 1995, No. 922, § 1.

12-12-1102. Acts 1995, No. 922, § 1.

12-12-1103. Acts 1995, No. 922, § 2.